apertium-tur-uzb.tur.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME:
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon


%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}n PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{pN%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}n%{I%}z PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{I%}%{pN%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!	CONJUNCTIONS, CAUSE EVEN SENTENCES AND WORDS WANNA BE TOGETHER !!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS 

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Numeral paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;                                        ! Beş evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} # ;                   ! Beşinci evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} SUBST ;      ! Beşinciyi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                           ! Beşi görüyorum.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adverb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adjective paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: CLIT-NOPERS ; ! FIXME: Check for overgeneration e.g. vardiyim

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Verb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!!!!!!!COPULA SUFFIXES!!!!!!


!! LEXICON PERS-COP-PRES

!%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
!%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;



LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
!%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;


LEXICON PERS1-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS1  !!!USED FOR CONT, FUT, AOR, EVID

%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>l%{A%}r%{D%}%{I%}r   CLIT ;
PERS1-NO3PL ;

LEXICON PERS2  !!!USED FOR PAST and CONDITIONAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS2-NO3PL 

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m  # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n  # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>k  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z  # ;

LEXICON PERS3  !!!USED FOR NECESSITATIVE

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS3-PAST
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}m # ;                
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n # ;                
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}k # ;                
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;                
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}d%{I%}l%{A%}r # ;  

LEXICON PERS4  !!!USED FOR IMPERATIVE
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>:%>y%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%}  # ;

LEXICON PERS5  !!!USED FOR negative aorist and abil
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}m  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>m%{A%}z%{D%}%{I%}r  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}y%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zs%{I%}n%{I%}z  CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>m%{A%}zl%{A%}r  CLIT ;

LEXICON PERS6 !!! USED By Exhortative

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}y%{I%}m  CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{y%}%{A%}l%{I%}m  CLIT ;

LEXICON KEN !!! ADVERBIAL FORM 

%<ken%>:%>ken # ;



LEXICON REC-DIR-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REC-T-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REC-T-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-DIR-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-T-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-T-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-T-IR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-T-IR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;


LEXICON IV-REC-DIR-AR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON IV-REF-DIR-AR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
IV-CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;


LEXICON PASS-DIR-AR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;


CAUS-DIR-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-AR ;
NEG ;
AOR-AR ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON PASS-T-AR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-AR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

CAUS-T-AR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-AR ;
NEG ;
AOR-AR ;
AOR-AR-CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON PASS-T-IR

%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NECE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NON-FINITE ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} GERUND ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} ABIL-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} NEG ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;
%<pass%>:%>%{i%}%{L%} FINITE-VERBS-IR ;

CAUS-T-IR ;
NECE ;
NON-FINITE ;
GERUND ;
ABIL-IR ;
NEG ;
AOR-IR ;
AOR-IR-CONDITIONAL ;


LEXICON REC-DIR-IR

%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<rec%>:%>%{i%}ş NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON REF-DIR-IR
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n CAUS-DIR-IR ;
%<ref%>:%>%{i%}n NECE ;
CAUS-DIR-IR ;
NECE ;

LEXICON  Conjunctions
ama:ama CC ; ! "but"
ile:İle CC ; ! "and" ! Dir/LR
ya:ya CC ; ! "either/or"
veya:veya CC ; ! "either/or"
da:da CC ; ! ""
fakat:fakat CC ; ! ""
ya da:ya da CC ; 
ancak:ancak CC ; 
çünkü:çünkü CC ; 
ha:ha CC ; 
ila:ila CC ; 
ne:ne CC ; 
veyahut:veyahut CC ; 
için:için CC ; 
kah:kah CC ; 
ise:ise CC ; ! "though"
ki:ki CS ; 
diye:diye CS ; 
olarak:olarak CS ; 
gibi:gibi CS ; 
eğer:eğer CS ; 
şayet:şayet CS ; 
nedeniyle:nedeniyle CS ; 
bari:bari CA ; 
çünkü:çünkü CA ; 
fakat:fakat CA ; 
hele:hele CA ; 
keza:keza CA ; 
mamafih:mamafih CA ; 
mesela:mesela CA ; 
olsun:olsun CA ; 
oysa ki:oysa ki CA ; 
sözgelişi:sözgelişi CA ; 
veya:veya CA ; 
yalnız:yalnız CA ; 
zaten:zaten CA ; 
yok% mu:yok% mu CA ; 
yeter% ki:yeter% ki CA ; 
şöyle% ki:şöyle% ki CA ; 
LEXICON Nouns
Osmanlı:Osmanlı A1 ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives
barışçı:barışçı A2 ; ! "pacifist"
hukuki:hukuki A2; ! "judicial"
ünlü:ünlü A4 ; ! "important"
tüzel:tüzel A4 ; ! "corporate"
güzel:güzel A1 ; ! "pretty, beautiful"
amaçlı:amaçlı A2 ; ! "orıented"
kabartma:kabartma A2 ;  ! "raised"
fena:fena A3 ;  ! "evil, bad, foul"
iğrenç:iğrenç  A3 ;  ! "disgusting"
sağ:sağ A2 ;  ! "alive"
düzeltici:düzeltici A2 ;  ! "proofreader"
ciddi:ciddi A3 ;  ! "serious"
haki:haki A2 ;  ! "khaki"
keyifli:keyifli A4 ;  ! "cheerful"
kasvetli:kasvetli A4 ;  ! "gloomy"
sarı:sarı A2 ;  ! "yellow"
tek:tek A1 ;  ! "single, only"
soluk:soluk A2 ;  ! "pale"
dışsal:dışsal A4 ;  ! "external"
yeşil:yeşil A2 ;  ! "green"
naçar:naçar A4 ;  ! "helpless"
hoş:hoş A3 ;  ! "nice, nice"
koşullu:koşullu A1 ;  ! "conditional"
dolu:dolu A2 ;  ! "full"
tez:tez A3 ;  ! "prompt"
bilgisiz:bilgisiz A1 ;  ! "insensible"
eksiksiz:eksiksiz A1 ;  ! "whole, complete"
eğitimsiz:eğitimsiz A1 ;  ! "uneducated"
sınırsız:sınırsız A1 ;  ! "limitless"
açgöz:açgöz A1 ;  ! "greedy"
kusursuz:kusursuz A1 ;  ! "perfect"
müstesna:müstesna A3 ;  ! ""
ücra:ücra A4 ;  ! ""
kıyasıya:kıyasıya A3 ;  ! ""
genç:genç%{v%} A2 ;  ! ""
körpe:körpe A1 ;  ! ""
yekpare:yekpare A3 ;  ! ""
ivedi:ivedi A4 ;  ! ""
sürekli:sürekli A3 ;  ! ""
önemli:önemli A2 ;  ! ""
hızlı:hızlı A3 ;  ! ""
müstahak:müstahak A2 ;  ! ""
tuzlak:tuzlak A4 ;  ! ""
pek:pek A3 ;  ! ""
şımarık:şımarık A4 ;  ! ""
geometrik:geometrik A1 ;  ! ""
ilkel:ilke4 A1 ;  ! ""
işitsel:işitsel A4 ;  ! ""
faşizan:faşizan A4 ;  ! ""
mümin:mümin A2 ;  ! ""
kesin:kesin A3 ;  ! ""
tutkun:tutkun A4 ;  ! ""
hazır:hazır A3 ;  ! ""
sallabaş:sallabaş A4 ;  ! ""
loş:loş A3 ;  ! ""
alt:alt A2 ;  ! ""
doğru:doğru A1 ;  ! ""
pisboğaz:pisboğaz A4 ;  ! ""
temiz:temiz A3 ;  ! ""
devrimsel:devrimsel A1 ; ! "revolutionary"
LEXICON Adverbs 
ahiren:ahiren ADV3 ; ! "lately"
apriori:apriori ADV3 ; ! "apriori"
bari:bari ADV3 ; ! "at least"
bilmukabele:bilmukabele ADV3 ; ! "mutually"
çabucacık:çabucacık ADV3 ; ! "in no time"
çök:çök ADV3 ; ! "a lot"
ekseriya:ekseriya ADV3 ; ! "mostly"
faraza:faraza ADV3 ; ! "let's suppose that" @@@@
gerçekten:gerçekten ADV3 ; ! "really"
güya:güya ADV3 ; ! "so to speak"
henüz:henüz ADV3 ; ! "just"
içeri:içeri ADV1 ; ! "indoor"
geçici:geçici ADV1 ; ! "momentaneouly"
teferruatla:teferruatla ADV1 ; ! "w"
ille:ille ADV3 ; ! "necessarily"
kerhen:kerhen ADV3 ; ! "unwillingly"
loppadak:loppadak ADV3 ; ! "with a plop"
öte:öte ADV1 ; ! "the other" @@@ß
amiyane:amiyane  ADV2 ; ! vulgarly
apaçık:apaçık  ADV2 ; ! "obviously"
azıcık:azıcık  ADV2 ; ! "slightly"
bertaraf:bertaraf  ADV2 ; ! "aside"
bilfiil:bilfiil  ADV2 ; ! "defacto"
biteviye:biteviye  ADV2 ; ! "ceaslessly"
çabucak:çabucak  ADV2 ; ! "fastly"
direkt:direkt  ADV2 ; ! "direct"
epey:epey  ADV2 ; ! "reasonably"
geri:geri  ADV2 ; ! "back""inverted"
gerisingeriye:gerisingeriye  ADV2 ; ! "backwards"
gıyaben:gıyaben  ADV2 ; ! "inabsentia"
ilk:İlk ADV2 ; ! "first" ! Dir/LR
irticalen:irticalen ADV2 ; ! "impromptu"
kuşkusuz:kuşkusuz ADV2 ; ! "indubitably"
zor:zor ADV2 ; ! "hard"
acele:acele ADV1 ; ! "fastly"
çok:çok%{v%} ADV1 ; ! "lot"
olabildiğince:olabildiğince ADV3 ; ! "as far as"
önce:önce ADV1 ; ! "previously" @@@@ postp
öyle:öyle ADV1 ; ! "thusly"
böyle:böyle ADV1 ; ! "thusly"
tıpatıp:tıpatıp ADV3 ; ! "alike"
